pt-PT: Tipo de ajuste interno do estojo para oboé: Sistema de compartimentos/blocos ajustáveis; Moldado (forma de instrumento); Sistema (flutuante) suspenso; Compartimento almofadado universal; Outro
hu: Oboatok belső illeszkedési típusa: Állítható blokk/rekesz rendszer; Formázott (hangszer alakú); Felfüggesztett (lebegő) rendszer; Univerzális párnázott rekesz; Egyéb
de: Innenpassform des Oboenkoffers: Verstellbares Block-/Fächersystem; Geformt (Instrumentenform); Freischwebendes System; Gepolstertes Universalfach; Andere
ro-RO: Tipul de amenajare interioară a cutiei pentru oboi: Sistem cu bloc/compartiment ajustabil; Turnat (în formă de instrument); Sistem suspendat (flotant); Compartiment universal căptușit; Altele
sk-SK: Typ vnútorného usporiadania puzdra na hoboj: Nastaviteľný systém blokov/priehradiek; Tvarované (v tvare nástroja); Závesný (plávajúci) systém; Univerzálna vystlaná priehradka; Iné
pl: Typ wewnętrznego dopasowania futerału na obój: Regulowany system bloków/przegród; Profilowany (w kształcie instrumentu); System zawieszony (pływający); Uniwersalna wyściełana przegroda; Inny
fr: Type d’aménagement intérieur de l’étui de hautbois: Système de blocs/compartiments ajustables; Moulé (en forme d'instrument); Système suspendu (flottant); Compartiment rembourré universel; Autre
sv: Invändig passform för oboefodral: Justerbart kloss-/facksystem; Formgjuten (instrumentformad); Upphängt (flytande) system; Universellt vadderat fack; Övrigt
ja: オーボエケース内部フィットタイプ: 調整可能なブロック/コンパートメントシステム; 成形 (楽器型); サスペンド (フローティング) システム; ユニバーサルパッド入りコンパートメント; その他
el: Τύπος εσωτερικής εφαρμογής θήκης όμποε: Σύστημα προσαρμόσιμων μπλοκ/διαμερισμάτων; Χυτή (στο σχήμα του οργάνου); Σύστημα ανάρτησης (αιωρούμενο); Διαμέρισμα γενικής χρήσης με επένδυση; Άλλο
lt-LT: Obojaus dėklo vidinio pritaikymo tipas: Reguliuojama blokų / skyrių sistema; Lieto profilio (formos pagal instrumentą); Pakabinama („plaukiojanti“) sistema; Universalus paminkštintas skyrius; Kita
pt-BR: Estojo para oboé tipo de ajuste interno: Sistema de blocos/compartimentos ajustáveis; Moldado (formato do instrumento); Sistema suspenso (flutuante); Compartimento acolchoado universal; Outro
zh-CN: 双簧管盒内部适配类型: 可调节挡块/隔层系统; 模压型（乐器形状）; 悬浮（浮动）系统; 通用带垫隔层; 其他
th: ประเภทการจัดวางภายในของเคสโอโบ: ระบบบล็อก/ช่องจัดเก็บแบบปรับได้; แม่พิมพ์เข้ารูป (ตามรูปทรงเครื่องดนตรี); ระบบลอยตัว (ลดการกระแทก); ช่องบุนวมแบบอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип внутренней посадки футляра для гобоя: Регулируемая система блоков/отсеков; Формованный (по форме инструмента); Подвесная (плавающая) система; Универсальный мягкий отсек; Другое
nb: Oboetuiets innvendige passform: Justerbart blokk-/romsystem; Formstøpt (instrumentformet); Svevende (flytende) system; Universelt polstret rom; Annet
da: Indvendig pasform i oboetui: Justerbart blok-/rumsystem; Formstøbt (instrumentformet); Affjedret system; Universalt polstret rum; Andet
nl: Hobo koffer interne pasvormtype: Systeem met verstelbare blokken/vakken; Gegoten (instrumentvormig); Zwevend systeem; Universeel gewatteerd vak; Overig
tr: Obua kılıfı iç uyum tipi: Ayarlanabilir blok/bölme sistemi; Kalıplanmış (enstrüman şekilli); Askılı (yüzer) sistem; Evrensel dolgulu bölme; Diğer
es: Tipo de ajuste interno del estuche para oboe: Sistema de bloque/compartimento ajustable; Moldeado (con forma de instrumento); Sistema suspendido (flotante); Compartimento acolchado universal; Otro
cs: Typ vnitřního přizpůsobení pouzdra hoboje: Systém nastavitelných bloků/přihrádek; Tvarované (podle nástroje); Plovoucí systém; Univerzální polstrovaná přihrádka; Ostatní
fi: Oboekotelon sisäketyyppi: Säädettävä lohko-/lokeristojärjestelmä; Valettu (soittimen muotoinen); Kelluva järjestelmä; Universaali pehmustettu lokero; Muu
ko: 오보에 케이스 내부 맞춤 유형: 조절식 블록/수납공간 시스템; 몰딩(악기 모양); 서스펜션(플로팅) 시스템; 범용 패딩 수납공간; 기타
vi: Loại hộp đựng kèn oboe vừa khít bên trong: Hệ thống khối/ngăn có thể điều chỉnh; Đúc khuôn (theo hình nhạc cụ); Hệ thống treo (nổi); Ngăn đệm đa năng; Khác
hr-HR: Unutarnji tip kutije za obou: Sustav prilagodljivih blokova/pretinaca; Kalupljeni (u obliku instrumenta); Viseći (plutajući) sustav; Univerzalni podstavljeni pretinac; Ostalo
zh-TW: 雙簧管琴盒內部適配類型: 可調式隔塊/隔層系統; 模壓成型 (樂器形狀); 懸浮系統; 通用加厚隔層; 其他
bg-BG: Тип вътрешно прилягане на калъф за обой: Регулируема система от блокове/отделения; Формован (с формата на инструмента); Окачена (плаваща) система; Универсално подплатено отделение; Друго
it: Tipo di adattamento interno della custodia per oboe: Sistema a blocchi/scomparti regolabili; Sagomato (a forma di strumento); Sistema sospeso (flottante); Scomparto imbottito universale; Altro
en: Oboe case internal fit type: Adjustable block/compartment system; Molded (instrument-shaped); Suspended (floating) system; Universal padded compartment; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta notranjega prileganja kovčka za oboo: Sistem s prilagodljivimi bloki/predelki; Oblikovan (po obliki instrumenta); Viseči (lebdeči) sistem; Univerzalni oblazinjeni predelek; Drugo